Massachusetts, session 194th, H4342.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 34 the following section:
Section 35: Reimbursement of costs for medically appropriate evaluation and
management services in outpatient settings, including but not limited to office- and hospital-
based clinics, in accordance with guidelines developed by the division of insurance, shall be part
of a basic benefits package offered by the insurer or a third party and shall not require a
deductible; provided, however, that deductibles shall be required if the applicable plan is
governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result
of the prohibition on deductibles for these services.
SECTION 2. Chapter 32B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 29 the following section:
Section 30: Reimbursement of costs for medically appropriate evaluation and
management services in outpatient settings, including but not limited to office- and hospital-
of 4

based clinics, in accordance with guidelines developed by the division of insurance, shall be part
of a basic benefits package offered by the insurer or a third party and shall not require a
deductible; provided, however, that deductibles shall be required if the applicable plan is
governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result
of the prohibition on deductibles for these services.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, before
section 47CCC, the following section:-
Section 47AAA: Reimbursement of costs for medically appropriate evaluation and
management services in outpatient settings, including but not limited to office- and hospital-
based clinics, in accordance with guidelines developed by the division of insurance, shall be part
of a basic benefits package offered by any blanket or general policy of insurance described in
subdivision (A), (C), or (D) of section one hundred and ten which is issued or subsequently
renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder, within or without the
commonwealth, during the period within which this premium is effective, or any policy of
accident or sickness insurance as described in section one hundred and eight which provides
hospital expense and surgical expense insurance and which is delivered or issued for delivery or
subsequently renewed by agreement between the insurer and the policyholder in the
commonwealth, during the period within which this provision is effective, or any employers'
health and welfare fund which provides hospital expense and surgical expense benefits and
which is issued or renewed to any person or group of persons in the commonwealth, during the
period within which this provision is effective, and shall not require a deductible; provided,
however, that deductibles shall be required if the applicable plan is governed by the Federal
of 4

Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result of the prohibition on
deductibles for these services.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8DDD, the following section:-
Section 8EEE: Reimbursement of costs for medically appropriate evaluation and
management services in outpatient settings, including but not limited to office- and hospital-
based clinics, in accordance with guidelines developed by the division of insurance, shall be part
of a basic benefits package offered by the insurer or a third party and shall not require a
deductible; provided, however, that deductibles shall be required if the applicable plan is
governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result
of the prohibition on deductibles for these services.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4DDD the following section:-
Section 4EEE: Reimbursement of costs for medically appropriate evaluation and
management services in outpatient settings, including but not limited to office- and hospital-
based clinics, in accordance with guidelines developed by the division of insurance, shall be part
of a basic benefits package offered by the insurer or a third party and shall not require a
deductible; provided, however, that a deductible shall be required if the applicable plan is
governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result
of the prohibition on deductibles for these services.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 33 the following section:-
of 4

Section 34: Reimbursement of costs for medically appropriate evaluation and
management services in outpatient settings, including but not limited to office- and hospital-
based clinics, in accordance with guidelines developed by the division of insurance, shall be part
of a basic benefits package offered by the insurer or a third party and shall not require a
deductible; provided, however, that a deductible shall be required if the applicable plan is
governed by the Federal Internal Revenue Code and would lose its tax-exempt status as a result
of the prohibition on deductibles for these services.
of 4